Louisiana, session 2026, SB379.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:3(7), 4(C)(14), (D)(1)(a) and (5), (G), and (I)(2), 5(C)(1), the
introductory paragraph of (C)(2), and (6), and (D)(1), 5.1(A)(1) and (B)(1), 6.1(A) and
(C),12(A)(2), 21.1(A)(3) and (D)(5), 23(D)(2), 26, 29(A) and (I)(4), 73(1), 74(A)(3) and (B),
98.3(B), 101.2(A), 101.5(A), 127(A), 136.3(B)(1) and (C), 153(A), the introductory
paragraph of 548, 917(F), 1110(A)(2) and (C)(1)(f) and (g) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 30:12(A)(3), 84(A)(9) and (10), and 2050.22(C) are hereby enacted to
read as follows:
§3. Definitions
Unless the context otherwise requires, the words defined in this Section have
Page 1 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
the following meaning when found in this Subtitle:
* * *
(7) "Gas" means all natural gas, including casinghead gas, and all other
hydrocarbons not defined as oil in Paragraph (7) (12) of this Section.
* * *
§4. Jurisdiction, duties, and powers of the secretary; rules and regulations
* * *
C. The secretary has authority to make, after notice and hearings as provided
in this Chapter, any reasonable rules, regulations, and orders that are necessary from
time to time in the proper administration and enforcement of this Chapter, including
rules, regulations, or orders for the following purposes:
* * *
(14) To require interested persons to place uniform meters of a type approved
by the secretary wherever the secretary designates on all pipelines, gathering
systems, barge terminals, loading racks, refineries, or other places necessary or
proper to prevent waste and the transportation of illegally produced oil or gas. These
meters shall be under the supervision and control of the department of conservation.
It shall be a violation of this Chapter, subject to the penalties provided in R.S. 30:18,
for any person to refuse to attach or install a meter when ordered to do so by the
secretary, or in any way to tamper with the meters so as to produce a false or
inaccurate reading, or to have any device through which the oil or gas can be passed
around the meter, unless expressly authorized by written permit of the secretary.
* * *
D. The secretary may make, after notice and public hearing as provided in
this Chapter, any reasonable rules, regulations, and orders that are necessary:
(1) To require that all pipelines, all wells, and all associated structures,
including any fittings, tie-overs, appliances, and equipment, which are constructed
on state water bottoms pursuant to the grant of a right-of-way by the secretary of the
Department of Conservation and Energy or the issuance of a lease by the State
Mineral and Energy Board shall conform to the following provisions:
Page 2 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
(a) The owner or operator of a pipeline constructed on a right-of-way granted
on state water bottoms shall be responsible for burying the line to a depth consistent
with regulations promulgated by the office of conservation department and for
maintaining it at said depth to the extent feasible and practical, as determined by the
secretary, taking into account the changes wrought by natural forces.
* * *
(5) To provide that the office of conservation department shall conduct such
inspections as the secretary may deem necessary or appropriate in carrying out the
provisions of this Subsection.
* * *
G. The Department of Conservation and Energy, through the secretary, shall
implement the provisions of Subsections D, E, and F of this Section as to interstate
pipelines insofar as those requirements may be consistent with the regulations for
interstate pipelines adopted by the United States Department of Transportation. In
such event, the office department shall further implement the provisions of
Subsections D, E, and F of this Section insofar as those requirements may be
consistent with the regulations for interstate pipelines adopted by the United States
Department of Energy.
* * *
I. The secretary shall make, after notice and public hearing as provided in this
Chapter, any reasonable rules, regulations, and orders that are necessary to control
the offsite disposal at commercial facilities of drilling mud, saltwater and other
related nonhazardous wastes generated by the drilling and production of oil and gas
wells. Such regulations shall contain provisions identifying the waste materials to be
regulated. Such regulations shall at a minimum require:
* * *
(2) At least thirty days prior to filing such application with the office
department, the applicant shall publish a notice of intent to file the application,
which notice shall contain sufficient information to identify the applicant, the
proposed site at which disposal operations will occur, the nature and content of the
Page 3 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
waste streams to be disposed of, and the method of disposal to be used. Such notice
shall be published on three separate days in the official journal of the parish in which
the proposed facility will be located, and in the official journal of the state, not less
than one quarter of a page in size and printed in boldface type.
* * *
§5. Permission to convert gas into carbon black; recycling gas; unit operations
* * *
C.(1) Without any way modifying the authority granted to the secretary in
R.S. 30:9(B) to establish a drilling unit or units for a pool and in addition to the
authority conferred in Subsection B of this Section:
(a) The secretary of the office of conservation upon the application of any
interested party, also is authorized and empowered to enter an order requiring the
unit operation of any pool or a combination of two pools in the same field,
productive of oil or gas, or both, in connection with the institution and operation of
systems of pressure maintenance by the injection of gas, water, or any other
extraneous substance, or in connection with any program of secondary or tertiary
recovery; and
(b) The secretary of the office of conservation is further authorized and
empowered to require the unit operation of a single pool in any situation where the
ultimate recovery can be increased and waste and the drilling of unnecessary wells
can be prevented by such a unit operation.
(2) In connection with such an order of unit operation, the secretary of the
office of conservation shall have the right to unitize, pool, and consolidate all
separately owned tracts and other property ownerships. Any order for such a unit
operation shall be issued only after notice and hearing and shall be based on all of
the following findings:
* * *
(6) No order of the secretary entered pursuant hereto shall have the effect of
enlarging, displacing, varying, altering, or in anywise whatsoever modifying or
changing contracts in existence on the effective date of this Act August 15, 1984,
Page 4 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
concerning the unitization of any pool (reservoir) or pools (reservoirs) or field (as
defined in the contract) for the production of oil, gas, brine, or any combination
thereof.
D.(1) In order to prevent waste and increase the ultimate recovery of oil or
gas, or both, the secretary of the office of conservation, upon the application of any
interested owner, and only after notice and a public hearing, is authorized to approve
a cyclic injection project for the operation of a well by the method of enhanced
recovery known as cyclic injection, without the formation of a unit under Subsection
C of this Section or under any other provisions of this Chapter. No operator shall
utilize cyclic injection without first securing the secretary's approval pursuant to this
Subsection. For the purposes of this Subsection, "cyclic injection" is hereby defined
as a single-well process in which a production well is injected with a substance for
the purpose of enhanced recovery. After a shut-in period, the well is returned to
production. This procedure may be performed repeatedly on one or more wells in a
reservoir.
* * *
§5.1. Deep pool order; ultra deep structure units; application; procedure; allocation
of costs; rules and regulations
A. The following shall be applicable to deep pool units:
(1) In order to prevent waste and to avoid the drilling of unnecessary wells,
and to encourage the development of deep oil and gas pools in Louisiana, the
secretary of conservation is authorized, as provided in this Subsection, to establish
a single unit to be served by one or more wells for a deep pool and to adopt a
development plan for such deep unit.
* * *
B. The following shall be applicable to ultra deep structure units:
(1) In order to prevent waste and to avoid the drilling of unnecessary wells,
and to encourage the development of ultra deep oil and gas structures in Louisiana,
the secretary of conservation is authorized, as provided in this Subsection, to
establish a single unit to be served by one or more wells for an ultra deep structure
Page 5 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
and to adopt a plan of development for such ultra deep structure unit. For purposes
of this statute Section, a "structure" is defined as a unique geologic feature that
potentially traps hydrocarbons in one or more pools or zones.
* * *
§6.1. Declaration of emergency
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Title, upon receipt of evidence
that there is an incident occurring or threatening to occur imminently at an oilfield
site or other facility, structure, or pipeline under the department's jurisdiction
pursuant to R.S. 30:1 et seq., which is of such magnitude as to require immediate
action to prevent substantial or irreparable damage to the environment or a serious
threat to life or safety based on recognized criteria, standards or industry practices,
the department secretary may declare in writing that an emergency exists.
* * *
C. When an emergency situation is declared, the department secretary is
authorized to undertake the containment and abatement of the pollution source and
pollutants and may retain personnel or contract for these purposes with persons who
shall operate under his direction. All contracts let by the department secretary to
respond to a declared emergency shall be exempt from the provisions of Chapter 10
of Title 38 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 and the Louisiana Procurement
Code. However, the department secretary may employ an informal bidding
procedure by which bids are solicited from at least three bidders and may order the
operator of record or owner to undertake the containment, abatement, or cleanup of
such pollution source and pollutants. Failure to comply with his order shall be a
violation of this Title and shall be punishable as provided in this Title. The
department shall submit an annual report to the House Committee on Natural
Resources and Environment and Senate Committee on Natural Resources listing the
number and type of emergencies declared within the previous year.
* * *
§12. Court review and injunction; venue; procedure; burden of proof
A. * * *
Page 6 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
(2) Suit for review shall be instituted in the district court of the parish in
which the principal office of the secretary is located and must be brought within sixty
days of the administrative action that is the subject of the suit. In cases of judicial
review of adjudication proceedings, the sixty days sixty-day period shall begin to
run after mailing of notice of the final decision or order, or if a rehearing is requested
within sixty days after the decision thereon. as follows:
(a) If a rehearing is not requested, the sixty-day period shall begin to run
after the final decision or order is posted on the official website for the
department.
(b) If a rehearing is requested, the sixty-day period shall begin to run
after the decision regarding the rehearing is posted on the official website for
the department.
(3) A third person having an interest in the matter subject to review has
the right to intervene as a party in an action under this Section when the
intervention is unlikely to unduly broaden the issues or to unduly impede the
resolution of the action. A "third person having an interest" with the right to
intervene under this Section shall include but not be limited to any applicant,
permittee, or party to the underlying administrative process, action, or
proceeding that resulted in the issuance of the rule, regulation, order, or permit
that is the subject of the suit for review. For avoidance of doubt, the provisions
of this Paragraph shall be given prospective and retroactive application.
* * *
§21.1. Natural Resources Financial Security Fund
A. * * *
(3) The funds received shall be placed in the Natural Resources Financial
Security Fund in the custody of the state treasurer to be used only in accordance with
this Part and shall not be placed in the general fund. The funds provided to the trust
authority pursuant to this Section shall at all times be and remain the property of the
trust authority. The monies in this fund shall be used solely as provided in this
Section and only in the amount appropriated by the legislature. All unexpended and
Page 7 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
unencumbered monies remaining in this fund at the end of the fiscal year shall
remain in the fund. Except for the pledge of the revenues provided in R.S. 30:83.1,
it is the intent of the legislature that this fund and its increments shall remain intact
and inviolate. Monies in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer in the same
manner as monies in the state general fund. At the request of the Natural Resources
Trust Authority, the state treasurer may invest monies in the fund, or any portion
thereof, in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 33:2955, including the use of the
Louisiana Asset Management Pool, a separate portfolio and any interest earned on
such investments shall be credited to the fund.
* * *
D. Monies in the fund shall be used solely for the following purposes:
* * *
(5) Upon request by the Natural Resources Trust Authority and with the
approval of the Mineral and Energy Board, the state treasurer is hereby authorized
and directed to transfer from the Natural Resources Financial Security Fund to the
Mineral and Energy Operations Operation Fund such amounts as are approved by
the board and deemed necessary to implement any purpose for which monies in the
Mineral and Operations Energy Operation Fund may be used, subject to the
availability of funds and in accordance with applicable law.
* * *
§23. Underground storage of liquid or gaseous hydrocarbons or both, carbon
dioxide, hydrogen, nitrogen, ammonia, compressed air, or noble
gases not otherwise prohibited by law
* * *
D.(1) * * *
(2) Upon presentation of the findings and determination by the secretary to
the committees on natural resources of the Senate and House of Representatives and
approval by said committees of any such projects, the secretary shall authorize the
secretary to initiate such procedures as the secretary deems necessary within the
scope of his authority under Chapter 7 of this Title and the constraints of this Section
Page 8 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
to accomplish the purposes hereof.
* * *
§26. Applications and notification of completeness
A. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the secretary of the
Department of Conservation and Energy shall, after notification by the department
to the applicant that the application is complete, grant or deny all applications for all
permits, licenses, registrations, or compliance in this or any other Title within sixty
days. The notification of completeness shall be issued within fourteen days,
exclusive of holidays, by the department. If the application is not complete the
department shall notify the applicant in writing of the deficiencies which cause the
application not to be complete. If the secretary or the secretary does not grant the
application, the secretary or the secretary shall provide written reasons for his
decision to deny, and copies of the decision shall be provided to all parties. The
secretary and the secretary may delegate the power to grant permits, licenses,
registrations, variances, or compliance schedules to an assistant.
B. If the secretary does not grant or deny the application within the time
period provided for in this Section, the applicant may file a rule as provided for in
R.S. 49:978.
* * *
§29. Remediation of oilfield sites and exploration and production sites
A. The legislature hereby finds and declares that Article IX, Section 1 of the
Constitution of Louisiana mandates that the natural resources and the environment
of the state, including ground water, are to be protected, conserved, and replenished
insofar as possible and consistent with the health, safety, and welfare of the people
and further mandates that the legislature enact laws to implement this policy. It is the
duty of the legislature to set forth procedures to ensure that damage to the
environment is evaluated and if necessary remediated to a standard that protects the
public interest. To this end, this Section provides the procedure for judicial
resolution of claims for environmental damage to property arising from activities
subject to the jurisdiction of the Department of Conservation and Energy, office of
Page 9 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
conservation. The provisions of this Section shall be implemented upon receipt of
timely notice as required by Paragraph (B)(1) of this Section. The provisions of this
Section shall not be construed to impede or limit provisions under private contracts
imposing remediation obligations in excess of the requirements of the department or
limit the right of a party to a private contract to enforce any contract provision in a
court of proper jurisdiction.
* * *
I. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:
* * *
(4) "Most feasible plan" means the most reasonable plan which addresses
environmental damage in conformity with the requirements of Article IX, Section
1 of the Constitution of Louisiana to protect the environment, public health, safety
and welfare, and is in compliance with the specific relevant and applicable standards
and regulations promulgated by a state agency in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act in effect at the time the most feasible plan to evaluate or if necessary
remediate environmental damage resulting from oilfield or exploration and
production operations or waste is approved or structured.
* * *
§73. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed to
them in this Section, unless the context or use clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Commissioner" means the secretary of the Department of Conservation
and Energy or his authorized representatives from the injection and mining division
of that office.
* * *
§74. Abandoned oilfield waste sites; notification; clean up
A.(1) * * *
(3)(a) Prior to any sheriff's sale or public auction of any property related to
the operation of oil and gas wells, the person seeking such sale shall notify the
Page 10 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
secretary of such sale not less than thirty days prior to such sale. Such sale shall not
occur unless the secretary consents thereto in writing, and the sale shall include the
wellbore unless specifically excluded from the sale. In the event the wellbore is not
specifically excluded from the sale as provided herein, the sheriff or person seeking
such a sale shall cause to be included in the notice of the sale and in the sale
instrument a statement or notice that the purchaser shall be required to file the
appropriate documents with the department to become operator of record of the
subject well pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 30:204 30:28.
(b) The secretary may, if he deems it appropriate to insure ensure the proper
plugging and abandonment of the wells and closure of the associated oilfield pits,
retain a first lien and privilege on such property, which lien and privilege shall
follow such property into the hands of third persons whether such persons are in
good or bad faith. The secretary shall record a notice of such lien with the clerk of
court in the parish in which the property is located and in which the sale is to occur.
The lien and privilege may be enforced against any person in possession of the
property in the same manner as a lien provided under the Louisiana Oil Well Lien
Act pursuant to R.S. 9:4861 et seq.
* * *
B. Any failure or refusal by an owner or operator or responsible person to
undertake such action as ordered by the secretary to take samples, monitor, contain,
or clean up an abandoned oilfield waste site shall be a violation of this Chapter, and
the commission department, in order to prevent damage to public health, the
environment, or an oil or gas strata, may immediately declare the site abandoned,
notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 30:75, and commence appropriate
proceedings under this Chapter, including the recovery of penalties, revocation of
any permit, closure of the site, or any combination thereof.
* * *
§84. Powers of the secretary
A. The powers of the secretary shall include without limitation the power to
do the following:
Page 11 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
* * *
§85(A)(3)(9) The secretary shall perform all regulatory functions imposed
by this Part.
§85(A)(4)(10) Modify funding requirements of site-specific trust accounts
either upon recommendation of the trust authority, the secretary, or upon his own
determination, based upon changes in operation, site conditions, or trust account
status.
* * *
§98.3. Powers of the Department of Conservation and Energy
* * *
B. If the office department finds that compliance with all the requirements
of this Part would result in undue hardship, an exemption from any one or more of
such requirements may be granted by the office to the extent necessary to ameliorate
such undue hardship and to the extent such exemption can be granted without
impairing the intent and purpose of this Part.
* * *
§101.2. Policy and purpose
A. The legislature finds and declares that it is in the public interest and within
the police power of this state to establish a fishermen's gear compensation and
underwater obstruction removal program and a fishermen's gear compensation and
underwater obstruction removal dedicated fund account to provide for the proper and
timely identification, inventory, and removal of underwater obstructions that are a
hazard to navigation and commercial fishing in the state, and to compensate
commercial fishermen for damage to their fishing gear from the underwater
obstructions. The program and fund account shall be administered, for purposes of
fishermen's gear compensation, by the secretary of the office of coastal management
and, for purposes of underwater obstruction, by the secretary of the Department of
Conservation and Energy.
* * *
§101.5. Powers of the secretary
Page 12 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
A. The powers of the secretary shall include without limitation the power to
do the following:
(1) Administer general oversight of expenditures or commitments to make
expenditures from the dedicated fund account for the identification, inventory, and
removal of underwater obstructions as he deems necessary and appropriate.
(2) Maintain all supervisory and fiscal responsibility imposed under the
provisions of this Part.
(3) Perform such other specific functions as may be enumerated or
envisioned by the provisions of this Part.
§101.6(A)(1)(4) Negotiate and execute contracts, upon such terms as he may
agree upon for underwater obstruction identification, inventory, and removal, and
other services necessary to meet the purpose of this Part.
§101.6(A)(2)(5) Publish an annual list of underwater obstruction sites, to
include an inventory of the type, size and depth of the obstruction, and any other
relevant information which would aid navigation and commercial fishing in the
vicinity of the obstruction.
§101.6(A)(3)(6) Prepare, evaluate, and approve an annual priority list for
underwater obstruction removal.
§101.6(A)(4)(7) Prepare, evaluate, and approve a list of contractors
acceptable to conduct obstruction removal.
§101.6(A)(5)(8) Administer and manage the Fishermen's Gear Compensation
and Underwater Obstruction Removal Program for identification, inventory, and
removal of underwater obstructions in the navigable coastal waters of the state.
§101.6(A)(6)(9) Administer and manage the Fishermen's Gear Compensation
and Underwater Obstruction Removal Dedicated Fund Account.
§101.6(A)(8)(10) Maintain a file on the location of known underwater
obstructions.
§101.6(A)(9)(11) Administer the payment of appropriate compensation for
commercial fishermen whose fishing gear is damaged by underwater obstructions in
the Louisiana territorial waters that overlie state-owned waterbottoms that are
Page 13 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
contained within the coastal zone boundaries as defined in R.S. 49:214.24.
* * *
§127. Opening bids; minimum royalties; terms of lease; deposit; security
A.(1) Only those bidders who are registered prospective leaseholders with the
office of mineral state resources, or those who register within two business days
after the lease sale at which the bid is opened and prior to the conditional issuance
of the lease, shall be allowed to obtain a mineral lease from the state of Louisiana.
Any bidder who is not properly registered with the office of mineral state resources
at the time bids are opened, but whose bid is otherwise acceptable, shall have until
the end of the second business day following the date on which the bid was
conditionally accepted by the State Mineral and Energy Board to become properly
registered with the office of mineral state resources. If the bidder remains
unregistered by the close of business of the second business day following the day
the mineral lease sale at which the bid was conditionally accepted, the conditionally
accepted bid shall be deemed rejected. The provisions of this Subsection shall also
apply in cases where there is no more than one bid made by unregistered prospective
leaseholders. Bids may be for the whole or any particularly described portion of land
advertised. At the time and place mentioned in the advertisement for the
consideration of bids, they shall be publicly opened. Bids received by the mineral
board shall be opened at any state-owned buildings situated in the city in which the
capitol is located. The mineral board has authority to accept the bid most
advantageous to the state and may lease upon whatever terms it considers proper.
However, the minimum royalties to be stipulated in any mineral lease, other than a
mineral lease executed by or on behalf of a school board, shall be:
(1)(a) One-eighth of all oil and gas produced and saved.
(2)(b) One-eighth of the value per long ton of sulphur produced and saved
which shall yield not less than two dollars per long ton.
(3)(c) One-eighth of the value per ton for all potash produced and saved,
which shall yield not less than ten cents per ton.
(4)(d) Five percent of all lignite produced and saved.
Page 14 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
(5)(e) Five percent of the value per ton on a dry salt basis for all salt produced
and saved, which shall yield not less than ten cents per ton.
(6)(f) One-eighth of all other minerals produced and saved.
(2) Notwithstanding provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection to the
contrary, the State Mineral and Energy Board may authorize minimum
royalties of less than one-eighth but greater than one-sixteenth upon a finding
that market conditions, commodity prices, or other economic factors warrant
royalty reduction.
* * *
§136.3. Mineral and Energy Operation Fund
* * *
B. Out of the funds remaining in the Bond Security and Redemption Fund,
after a sufficient amount is allocated from that fund to pay all obligations secured by
the full faith and credit of the state which become due and payable within any fiscal
year as required by Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the
treasurer in each fiscal year shall pay into the fund revenues and amounts from the
following sources:
(1) The amount received by the state through the office of state resources
from royalty field audit collections and nonjudicial settlements, including but not
limited to settlements of disputes of royalty audit findings, title disputes, and acreage
conflicts, and court-awarded judgments and settlements.
* * *
C. Monies in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer in the same
manner as monies in the state general fund. At the request of the Natural Resources
Trust Authority, the state treasurer may invest monies in the fund, or any portion
thereof, in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 33:2955, including the use of the
Louisiana Asset Management Pool. Interest a separate portfolio and any interest
earned on investment of monies in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
* * *
§153. Agencies may lease or administer through State Mineral and Energy Board
Page 15 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
A. Any agency may by resolution direct the State Mineral and Energy Board
to lease or otherwise contract for the exploration, development, or use of its land for
the development and production of minerals, oil, gas, or alternative energy
sources and for the purposes set forth in R.S. 30:148.2. The bonus money, if any,
received pursuant to any such contract shall be transmitted by the State Mineral and
Energy Board to the agency. After the execution of the original contract, all rights
and authority in connection therewith shall be vested in the agency to the same extent
as if the agency had itself administered and executed the contract.
* * *
§548. Exercise of powers
The secretary of conservation shall exercise his powers so as to provide,
under the priorities hereinafter set forth, to the maximum extent practicable, for:
* * *
§917. Inspections and monitoring
* * *
F. After the state has assumed exclusive jurisdiction of surface coal mining
operations as provided in Section 503 of P.L. 95-87, and as long as the state retains
such jurisdiction, then no employee of the department performing any function or
duty under this Chapter shall have a direct or indirect financial interest in any surface
coal mining operation. Whoever knowingly violates the provisions of this Subsection
shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than two-thousand five
hundred dollars, or by imprisonment of not more than one year, or by both. The
secretary shall by regulation establish methods by which the provisions of this
Subsection will be monitored and enforced by the secretary, including appropriate
provisions for the filing by such employees in the review of statements and
supplements thereto concerning any financial interest which may be effected by this
Subsection. This Subsection shall not be given effect (1) if the Secretary of the
Interior does not require the inclusion of similar provisions in state laws as a
condition for approval by the Secretary of the Interior of state programs of regulation
of surface coal mining and reclamation operations pursuant to Section 503 of P.L.
Page 16 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
95-87 or (2) if any such requirement of the Secretary of the Interior is declared
invalid by final decree of a court of competent jurisdiction: Provided, that if similar
provisions are required by the Secretary of the Interior to be included in state laws,
the Secretary of Natural Resources and the secretary and the Secretary of the
Interior may commence and prosecute an action in the appropriate federal court to
have the regulation requiring inclusion declared invalid.
* * *
§1110. Carbon Dioxide Geologic Storage Trust Fund
A. * * *
(2) After compliance with the requirements of Article VII, Section 9(B) of
the Constitution of Louisiana relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund,
and after a sufficient amount is allocated from that fund to pay all of the obligations
secured by the full faith and credit of the state which become due and payable within
any fiscal year, the treasurer shall pay into the fund, an amount equal to the monies
received by the state treasury pursuant to this Chapter. The monies in this fund shall
be used solely as provided in this Section and only in the amount appropriated by the
legislature. All unexpended and unencumbered monies remaining in this fund at the
end of the fiscal year shall remain in the fund. The monies in the fund shall be
invested by the state treasurer in the same manner as monies in the state general fund
and all returns of such investment shall be deposited to the fund. At the request of
the Natural Resources Trust Authority, the state treasurer may invest monies in the
fund, or any portion thereof, in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 33:2955,
including the use of the Louisiana Asset Management Pool, in a separate portfolio
and any interest earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund. The funds
received shall be placed in the special trust fund in the custody of the state treasurer
to be used only in accordance with this Chapter and shall not be placed in the general
fund. The funds provided to the secretary pursuant to this Section shall at all times
be and remain the property of the secretary. The funds shall be used only for the
purposes set forth in this Chapter and for no other governmental purposes, nor shall
any branch of government be allowed to borrow any portion of the funds. It is the
Page 17 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
intent of the legislature that this fund and its increments shall remain intact and
inviolate.
* * *
C. The secretary is hereby authorized to levy on each storage facility the
following fees or costs for the purpose of funding the fund:
(1) A fee payable to the department, in a form and schedule prescribed by the
department, for each ton of carbon dioxide injected for storage into that storage
facility. This fee is to be determined based upon the following formula:
* * *
(f) Once five million dollars has been contributed to the fund for a storage
facility, the fee assessments to that storage facility under this Section shall cease
until such time as funds begin to be expended for that storage facility. The secretary
of the Department of Conservation and Energy shall certify to the secretary in
writing the date on which the balance in the fund for a storage facility equals or
exceeds five million dollars. The fund fees shall not be collected or required to be
paid on or after the first day of the second month following the certification, except
that the secretary shall resume collecting the fees on receipt of a certification from
the secretary of the Department of Conservation and Energy that, based on the
expenditures or commitments to expend monies, the fund has fallen below four
million dollars for that storage facility.
(g) Notwithstanding the total number of storage facilities owned or operated
by a storage operator, once ten million dollars has been contributed to the fund by
a storage operator, the fee assessment to that storage operator under this Section shall
cease until such time as funds begin to be expended for any storage facility owned
or operated by that storage operator. The secretary of the Department of
Conservation and Energy shall certify to the secretary in writing the date on which
the balance in the fund for a storage operator equals or exceeds ten million dollars.
The fund fees shall not be collected or required to be paid on or after the first day of
the second month following the certification, except that the secretary shall resume
collecting the fees upon receipt of a certification from the secretary of the
Page 18 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
Department of Conservation and Energy that, based on the expenditures or
commitments to expend monies, the fund has fallen below eight million dollars for
that storage operator.
* * *
§2050.22. Judicial review; appeal; stays; intervention
* * *
C. A third person having an interest in the matter subject to review has
the right to intervene as a party in an action commenced pursuant to R.S.
30:2050.21 when the intervention is unlikely to unduly broaden the issues or to
unduly impede the resolution of the action. A "third person having an interest"
with the right to intervene under this Section shall include but not be limited to
any applicant, permittee, or party to the underlying administrative process,
action, or proceeding that resulted in the issuance of a final permit action, final
enforcement action, or a declaratory ruling that is the subject of the petition for
review. For avoidance of doubt, the provisions of this Subsection shall be given
prospective and retroactive application.
Section 2. R.S. 36:356.1(D), 358(B), (E)(2), and (G) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§356.1. Louisiana Natural Resources Trust Authority; establishment; powers
* * *
D. The authority may request that the state treasurer invest funds, or any
portion thereof, under the control of the authority in accordance with the provisions
of R.S. 33:2955, including the use of the Louisiana Asset Management Pool in a
separate portfolio and any interest earned on investment of monies in the fund
shall be credited to the fund.
* * *
§358. Offices; purposes and functions
* * *
B. The office of the executive office of the secretary shall be responsible for
assisting the secretary in the exercise of the functions and duties established in law
Page 19 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
of the secretary. Among the divisions included within the executive office of the
secretary shall be the office of the natural resources commission to be headed by the
deputy secretary and the office of legal services to be headed by an attorney
designated by the secretary.
* * *
E. The office of state resources shall:
* * *
(2) Work in cooperation with the Center for Energy Studies Institute to
maintain current surface and subsurface geological surveys of the state, or otherwise
at the discretion of the secretary or his designee; conduct geological mapping;
prepare geological hazards assessments and resource inventories; and conduct
process investigations and related studies.
* * *
G. The office of energy shall organize, plan, supervise, direct, administer,
execute, and be responsible for the functions and programs relating to the
deployment and operation of alternative energy infrastructure in this state in a
manner that results in affordable and reliable energy. The office of energy shall also
work in cooperation with the Center for Energy Studies Institute to create and carry
out a central, comprehensive, and unified energy data and information program
which will collect, evaluate, assemble, analyze, and disseminate data and information
which is relevant to energy resource reserves, energy production, demand, and
technology, and related economic and statistical information, or which is relevant to
the adequacy of energy resources to meet demands in the near and longer term future
of the state. The office of energy shall work to provide the department and the
Natural Resources Commission with technical assistance and expertise in matters
related to energy and natural resources and shall also work to identify policy options
relative to energy related matters upon request. Finally, the office of energy shall
coordinate with academic and research institutions who possess specialized expertise
in areas related to energy and natural resources on behalf of the department.
* * *
Page 20 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
Section 3. R.S. 49:214.35(B), (E), and (F) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 49:214.35(G) and 978.1(A)(3) are enacted to read as follows:
§214.35. Reconsiderations, judicial review
* * *
B. A decision or determination shall be subject to reconsideration by the
secretary if a petition for reconsideration is filed in writing with the secretary within
ten days following public notice of a posting of the final coastal use permit or, local
program approval decision, or determination made under R.S. 49:214.34 on the
official website for the Department of Conservation and Energy or receipt of
written notice of a determination made under R.S. 49:214.30(C)(1) or R.S.
49:214.34. The grounds for reconsideration shall be either that one of the following:
(1) The decision or determination is clearly contrary to the law or the
evidence before the secretary;.
(2) The petitioner has discovered, since the decision or determination,
evidence important to the issues which he could not, with due diligence, have
presented to the secretary prior to the decision;.
(3) There is a showing that issues not previously considered, through no fault
of the petitioner, ought to be examined in order to properly dispose of the matter; or.
(4) There exist other good grounds for further consideration of the issues and
the evidence in the public interest.
* * *
E. Proceedings for review may be instituted by filing a petition in the district
court of the parish in which the proposed use is to be situated within thirty days after
mailing of notice of the final decision by the secretary or, if a reconsideration is
requested, within thirty days after the decision thereon. the following time periods:
(1) If a petition for reconsideration is not filed, the proceeding for review
shall be instituted within thirty days after the final decision by the secretary
under this Subpart is posted on the official website for the Department of
Conservation and Energy.
(2) If a petition for reconsideration is filed, the proceeding for review
Page 21 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
shall be instituted within thirty days after the decision regarding the
reconsideration is posted on the official website for the Department of
Conservation and Energy.
F. A third person having an interest in the matter subject to review has
the right to intervene as a party in an action for judicial review under this
Section when the intervention is unlikely to unduly broaden the issues or to
unduly impede the resolution of the action. A "third person having an interest"
with the right to intervene under this Section shall include but not be limited to
any applicant, permittee, or party to the underlying administrative process,
action, or proceeding that resulted in the issuance of the rule, regulation,
permit, decision, or determination that is the subject of the suit for review. For
avoidance of doubt, the provisions of this Subsection shall be given prospective
and retroactive application.
G. Judicial review shall otherwise be pursuant to the Louisiana
Administrative Procedure Act, provided that all such cases shall be tried with
preference and priority. Trial de novo shall be held upon request of any party.
* * *
§978.1. Judicial review of adjudication
A. * * *
(3) A third person having an interest in the matter subject to review has
the right to intervene as a party in an action under this Section when the
intervention is unlikely to unduly broaden the issues or to unduly impede the
resolution of the action. A "third person having an interest" with the right to
intervene under this Section shall include but not be limited to any applicant,
permittee, or party to the underlying administrative process, action, or
proceeding that resulted in the issuance of the decision or order that is the
subject of the suit for review. For avoidance of doubt, the provisions of this
Paragraph shall be given prospective and retroactive application.
* * *
Section 4. R.S. 30:4(O)(3), 85, and 101.6 are hereby repealed.
Page 22 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 379 ENROLLED
Section 5. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed to change all
references to the commissioner of conservation whose duties and powers were transferred
to the secretary of the Department of Conservation and Energy pursuant to Act No. 458 of
the 2025 Regular Session from "commissioner of conservation" to "secretary of the
Department of Conservation and Energy" and "commissioner" to "secretary" throughout the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
Section 6. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed to change all
references to the "office of mineral resources" to "office of state resources" throughout the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 except in the provisions of R.S. 30:124.1.
Section 7. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 23 of 23
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.